Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-935
New or former resident; application to vote; election commissioner or county clerk; duties.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall immediately mail the duplicate of the affidavit described in section 32-934 to the appropriate official of the state or county in Nebraska in which the applicant last resided. Upon receipt, the election commissioner or county clerk shall file each duplicate application or other official information from another state or county in Nebraska or the District of Columbia indicating that a former resident of this state or county in Nebraska has made application to vote at a presidential election in another state or county in Nebraska or the District of Columbia and shall maintain an alphabetical index of such information for a period of twenty-two months after the election.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 278;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 92.